Washington statutes.
RCW 18.265.070

Exclusions from chapter.

Nothing in this chapter prohibits or affects:

(1) The practice of dental therapy by an individual otherwise licensed under this title and performing services within his or her scope of practice;

(2) The practice of dental therapy in the discharge of official duties on behalf of the United States government including, but not limited to, the armed forces, coast guard, public health service, veterans' bureau, or bureau of Indian affairs;

(3) The practice of dental therapy pursuant to an education program described in RCW 18.265.030;

(4) The practice of dental therapy under the supervision of a dentist necessary to meet the clinical experience or preceptorship requirements of RCW 18.265.030; or

(5) The practice of federally certified dental health aide therapists or tribally licensed dental health aide therapists as authorized under chapter 70.350 RCW.

[ 2023 c 460 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 460 ss 1-22: See note following RCW 18.265.005.